Washington statutes.
RCW 10.99.100

Sentencing—Factors—Defendant's criminal history.

(1) In sentencing for a crime of domestic violence as defined in this chapter, courts of limited jurisdiction shall consider, among other factors, whether:

(a) The defendant suffered a continuing pattern of coercion, control, or abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a response to that coercion, control, or abuse;

(b) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or sexual abuse of a victim or multiple victims manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged period of time; and

(c) The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's minor children under the age of eighteen years.

(2)(a) In sentencing for a crime of domestic violence as defined in this chapter, the prosecutor shall provide for the court's review:

(i) The defendant's criminal history, if any, that occurred in Washington or any other state;

(ii) If available, the defendant's prior criminal history that occurred in any tribal jurisdiction; and

(iii) The defendant's individual order history.

(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, criminal history includes all previous convictions and orders of deferred prosecution, as reported through the judicial information system or otherwise available to the court or prosecutor, current to within the period specified in (c) of this subsection before the date of sentencing.

(c) The periods applicable to previous convictions and orders of deferred prosecution are:

(i) One working day, in the case of previous actions of courts that fully participate in the state judicial information system; and

(ii) Seven calendar days, in the case of previous actions of courts that do not fully participate in the judicial information system. For the purposes of this subsection, "fully participate" means regularly providing records to and receiving records from the system by electronic means on a daily basis.

[ 2010 c 274 s 404.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 c 274: See note following RCW 10.31.100.